Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,141
Adopt rules and regulations; administration of law; investigate violations.

The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146, including the placement of smoke detectors in dwellings, apartment houses, hotels, lodging houses, dormitories, and mobile homes. The rules and regulations shall take into account designs of the guest rooms, dwelling units, dormitories, and mobile homes. The State Fire Marshal may consider the requirements for smoke detectors developed by any national testing laboratory in adopting such rules and regulations. The State Fire Marshal shall administer the provisions of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146 and may delegate such responsibility to his or her authorized representative or the appropriate official charged with the duty of providing fire protection services within the local jurisdiction. The State Fire Marshal or his or her representative or the appropriate official may investigate any alleged violation of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146 and shall report such investigative findings to the county attorney who shall proceed to enforce the provisions of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 10.